test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-sibama88_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - sibama: # Verb (88) sibama 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     sibama+V+Inf/mA: sibama
     sibama+V+Inf: sipaq
     sibama+V+ActPrtPrc: sibanuq
     sibama+V+PssPrtPrc: sibat
     sibama+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: sipa
     sibama+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: sipa
     sibama+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: sibasi
     sibama+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: sibasi
